Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3908
Actions prohibited; construction of act.

(1) No injunction or writ of mandamus or other legal or equitable process shall issue in any suit, action, or proceeding in any court against this state to enjoin the collection of any tax, fee, or any amount of tax required to be collected under any tax program administered by the Tax Commissioner or Commissioner of Labor.

(2) The methods of enforcement and collection provided in the Uniform State Tax Lien Registration and Enforcement Act, including distraint and sale, shall be fully independent so that pursuit of any one method shall not be conditioned upon pursuit of any other, nor shall pursuit of any one method in any way affect or limit the right of the Tax Commissioner or Commissioner of Labor to subsequently pursue any of the other methods of enforcement or collection.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 221;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 184;

Laws 1999, LB 165, § 9;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 94.